Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 5. Senior Citizens Housing Development Fund.

Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of AS

18.56.800

—

18.56.810

are derived in part from former AS 44.47.610 — 44.47.620.

Administrative Code. —

For senior housing program, see 15 AAC 151, art. 5.

Sec. 18.56.800.
Declaration of purpose.

There exists in the state a serious shortage of decent, safe, and sanitary residential housing available at low or moderate prices or rentals to older individuals. There also exists in the state organizations whose purposes are to provide the kinds of housing needed to alleviate this shortage. Development work to provide such housing involves substantial expense that is often beyond the resources of the organizations.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 6 ch 84 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and purpose provisions relating to the 1998 amendment to this section, see § 1, ch. 84, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 18.56.810.
Senior citizens housing development.

There is created in the corporation a senior citizens housing development fund. Subject to direct appropriation or through proceeds of a bond issue, the corporation shall make grants to municipalities, public or private nonprofit corporations designated as tax exempt under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) and (4) (Internal Revenue Code of 1954), or regional housing authorities created in AS

18.55.996(b)

for the purpose of developing senior citizen housing. A grant from the proceeds of a bond issue may be made only to municipalities.

Application for a grant under (a) of this section shall be in the form prescribed by the corporation. The application

shall demonstrate the need for senior citizen housing in the area to be served and the feasibility of the proposed project; and

must include an adequate management plan that shall demonstrate the ability of the eligible recipient to sustain the proposed project.

A senior citizen housing project developed under this section

shall be prepared in accordance with facility procurement policies developed by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities under AS

35.10.160

—

35.10.200

; and

is a public facility under AS

35.10.160

—

35.10.200

.

The corporation shall adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of this section. The provisions of AS

18.56.088(a)

and (b) apply to regulations adopted under this section.

In this section, “senior citizen housing” has the meaning given “senior housing” in AS

18.56.799

.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 1 ch 8 SLA 2012)

Administrative Code. —

For senior citizens housing development grants, see 15 AAC 154, art. 2.